New York, session 2025-2026, A2610.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The state board of elections and the state education 2 department shall jointly examine, evaluate and make recommendations 3 concerning the safety of students and staff at schools used as polling 4 places for elections. 5 § 2. The state board of elections and/or the state education depart- 6 ment may request and shall receive from any subdivision, department, 7 board, bureau, commission, office, agency or other instrumentality of 8 the state or of any political subdivision thereof such assistance and 9 data as it deems necessary or desirable to effectuate the purposes set 10 forth in this act. 11 § 3. Within six months of the effective date of this act, the state 12 board of elections and the state education department shall submit a 13 joint report of their findings, conclusions and recommendations to the 14 governor and the legislature, and shall submit with such report such 15 regulatory and legislative proposals as they deem necessary to implement 16 their recommendations. 17 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04285-01-5